Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1149
Regional network, school, or center; admission; rules and regulations.

The admission to any regional network, school, or center, as provided by section 79-1148, shall be by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the State Board of Education.

Laws 1957, c. 388, § 2, p. 1347;

R.R.S.1943, § 83-247;

Laws 1961, c. 209, § 2, p. 624;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 43-618;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 38;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3338;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 831;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 42;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 37.